Washington statutes.
RCW 19.110.160

Actions by attorney general or prosecuting attorney to enjoin violations—Injunction—Appointment of receiver or conservator—Civil penalties.

(1)(a) The attorney general, in the name of the state or the director, or the proper prosecuting attorney may bring an action to enjoin any person from violating any provision of this chapter. Upon proper showing, the superior court shall grant a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or writ of mandamus.

The court may make such additional orders or judgments as may be necessary to restore to any person in interest and money or property, real or personal, which may have been acquired by means of an act prohibited or declared unlawful by this chapter.

The prevailing party may recover costs of the action, including a reasonable attorney's fee.

(b) The superior court issuing an injunction shall retain jurisdiction. Any person who violates the terms of an injunction shall pay a civil penalty of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars.

(2) The attorney general, in the name of the state or the director, or the proper prosecuting attorney may apply to the superior court to appoint a receiver or conservator for any person, or the assets of any person, who is subject to a cease and desist order, permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or writ of mandamus.

(3) Any person who violates any provision of this chapter except as provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section, is subject to a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand dollars for each violation. Civil penalties authorized by this subsection may be imposed in any civil action brought by the attorney general or proper prosecuting attorney under this chapter and shall be deposited in the state treasury. Any action for recovery of such civil penalty shall be commenced within five years.

(4) The director may refer evidence concerning violations of this chapter to the attorney general or proper prosecuting attorney. The prosecuting attorney, or the attorney general pursuant to authority granted by RCW 10.01.190, 43.10.230, 43.10.232, and 43.10.234 may, with or without such reference, institute appropriate criminal proceedings.

[ 2003 c 53 s 155; 1981 c 155 s 16.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.